District of Columbia statutes.
34-219

“Telegraph line” defined.

The term “telegraph line” when used in this subtitle includes conduits, ducts, poles, wires, cables, crossarms, instruments, machinery, appliances, and all devices, real estate, franchises, easements, apparatus, fixtures, property, and routes used, operated, controlled, or owned by any telegraph corporation to facilitate the business of affording communication by telegraph for hire.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 976, ch. 150, § 8, par. 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-220.
1973 Ed., § 43-120.